Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 12

Bledsoe Regional Water Authority [Repealed]

64-1-1201. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 2; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1219 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1202. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 3; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1203. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 4; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1204. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 5; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1205. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 6; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1206. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 7; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1207. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 8; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1208. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 9; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1209. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 10; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1210. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 11; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1211. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 12; 2017, ch. 94, § 79; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1212. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 13; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1213. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 14; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1214. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 15; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1215. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 16; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1216. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 17; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1217. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 18; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1218. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 19; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.

64-1-1219. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 20; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 740, § 1, effective June 20, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 223, § 22 provided that the creation and activation of the authority provided for in this part shall not occur until approved by a two-thirds (2/3) favorable vote of the governing body of Bledsoe County, which action may be by resolution. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Former Title 64, chapter 1, part 12, §§64-1-1201 —64-1-1217 concerned Bledsoe Regional Water Authority.